District of Columbia statutes.
42-3671.13

Limitation of actions.

A civil action under this chapter may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction within the later of one year after the date of the occurrence of any violation or 6 months after the lease-purchase agreement, together with any renewals or extensions thereof, ceases to be in effect. Notwithstanding the above, a civil action may be maintained by way of recoupment or counterclaim in an action brought against the consumer by the lessor or its assignee.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-99, § 14, 49 DCR 1000